Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2767 (4) 91 da/js/md H.F. 2767 DIVISION I 1 FARM-TO-TABLE EVENT 2 Section 1. Section 137F.1, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 6. âEventâ means a any of the following: 5 a. A significant occurrence or happening sponsored by 6 a civic, business, governmental, community, or veterans 7 organization and may include an athletic contest. 8 b. An occurrence or happening associated with a 9 farm-to-table event. 10 Sec. 2. Section 137F.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. âFarm-to-table eventâ means a temporary 13 food establishment in which an event is located on real estate 14 classified as agricultural property for property tax purposes, 15 if all of the following apply: 16 a. The person conducting the event holds a legal interest 17 in the agricultural property. 18 b. The event includes a meal prepared on the Iowa farm or 19 off site and transported to the farm by a food establishment 20 operating as a caterer. 21 c. (1) The event is conducted outdoors or within a 22 structure located on the Iowa farm. 23 (2) If the event is conducted in a structure, all of the 24 following apply: 25 (a) The structure is not being actively used to maintain a 26 farm animal as defined in section 673A.3. 27 (b) The structure is maintained in a clean condition. 28 d. At least fifty percent of the entire farm-to-table 29 meal, including entrees, drinks, side dishes, and desserts, 30 is derived from an agricultural product produced by persons 31 participating in the choose Iowa promotional program as 32 provided in chapter 187. 33 DIVISION II 34 COTTAGE FOOD 35 -1- HF 2767 (4) 91 da/js/md 1/ 3 H.F. 2767 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 137F.21 Cottage food ââ sale at a food 1 establishment ââ requirements. 2 1. A food establishment shall not offer for sale or sell a 3 cottage food unless all of the following apply: 4 a. The cottage food producer or an employee of the cottage 5 food producer delivers or distributes the cottage food directly 6 to the consumer. 7 b. The food establishment does not intermingle the cottage 8 food with food that is not cottage food. 9 c. The food establishment does not store the cottage 10 food with other food on the same shelf or as part of the same 11 display. 12 d. The cottage food is packaged. 13 e. The cottage food is affixed or labeled with the 14 information required under section 137F.20. 15 f. The food establishment posts a conspicuous notice at the 16 location where the cottage food is offered for sale or sold. 17 The notice must state the following: 18 âCOTTAGE FOOD 19 This product was produced at a residential property that is 20 exempt from state licensing and inspection. See the available 21 information provided on the packaged label.â 22 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a temporary food 23 establishment may provide a cottage food that is produced on 24 the farm to consumers during a farm-to-table event. 25 DIVISION III 26 RULEMAKING AND EFFECTIVE DATE 27 Sec. 4. EMERGENCY RULES. The department of inspections, 28 appeals, and licensing shall adopt emergency rules under 29 section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 17A.5, subsection 2, 30 paragraph âbâ, to implement the provisions of this Act within 31 one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this Act and 32 shall submit such rules to the administrative rules coordinator 33 and the administrative code editor pursuant to section 17A.5, 34 subsection 1, within the same period. The rules shall be 35 -2- HF 2767 (4) 91 da/js/md 2/ 3 H.F. 2767 effective immediately upon filing unless a later date is 1 specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in accordance with 2 this section shall also be published as a notice of intended 3 action as provided in section 17A.4. 4 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 5 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 6 -3- HF 2767 (4) 91 da/js/md 3/ 3